Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-4005
Revoke, defined.

Revoke shall mean to permanently void and recall all rights and privileges of a person to obtain a license or certification.

Laws 1987, LB 730, § 5;

Laws 2024, LB1204, § 27.